Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4428
Bonds; tax exempt.

All bonds of a city issued pursuant to the Good Life District Economic Development Act are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 21.